California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) The comprehensive perinatal provider shall schedule visits with appropriate providers and track the patient to verify whether services have been received. As part of the reimbursement for coordinating these services, the comprehensive perinatal provider shall ensure the provision of the following services either through the provider’s
 own service or through subcontracts or referrals to other providers:

(1) A psychosocial assessment and when appropriate referrals to counseling.

(2) Nutrition assessments and when appropriate referral to counseling on food supplement programs, vitamins, and breastfeeding.

(3) Health, childbirth, and parenting education.

(e) (1) Except where existing law prohibits the employment of physicians, a health care provider may employ or contract with all of the following medical and other practitioners for the purpose of providing the comprehensive services delineated in this section:

(A) Physicians, including a general practitioner, a family physician and surgeon, a pediatrician, or an obstetrician-gynecologist.

(B) Certified nurse-midwives.

(C) Licensed midwives.

(D) Nurses.

(E) Nurse practitioners.

(F) Physician assistants.

(G) Social workers.

(H) Health and childbirth educators.

(I) Registered dietitians.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations that define the qualifications of any of these practitioners who are not currently included under the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. Providers shall, as feasible, utilize staffing patterns that reflect the linguistic and cultural features of the populations they serve.

(f) The California Medical Assistance Program and the Maternal and Child Health Branch of the State Department of Public Health, in consultation with the California Conference of Local Health Officers, shall establish standards for health care providers and services rendered pursuant to this subdivision.

(g) The department shall assist local health departments to establish a community perinatal program whose responsibilities may include certifying and monitoring providers of comprehensive perinatal services. The department shall provide the local health departments with technical assistance for the purpose of implementing the community perinatal program. The department shall utilize, to the extent feasible, and to the extent funding for administrative costs is available, local health departments in the administration of the perinatal program. If these funds are
 unavailable, the department shall use alternative means to implement the community perinatal program.

(h) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department shall establish a method for reimbursement of comprehensive perinatal providers that shall include a fee for coordinating services and shall be sufficient to cover reasonable costs for the provision of comprehensive perinatal services. The department may utilize fees for service, capitated fees, or global fees to reimburse providers. However, if capitated or global fees are established, the department shall set minimum standards for the provision of services including, but not limited to, the number of prenatal visits, and the amount and type of psychosocial, nutritional, and educational services that patients receive.

(2) Notwithstanding the type of reimbursement system, the comprehensive perinatal provider shall not be financially at risk for the provision of inpatient services. The provision of inpatient services that are not related to perinatal care shall not be subject to the requirements of this section. Inpatient services related to services pursuant to this subdivision shall be reimbursed, in accordance with Section 14081, 14086, 14087, or 14087.2,
 whichever is applicable.

(i) The department shall develop systems for the monitoring and oversight of the comprehensive perinatal services provided in this section. The monitoring shall include, but shall not be limited to, the collection of information using the perinatal data form.

(j) Participation for services provided pursuant to this section shall be voluntary. The department shall adopt patient rights safeguards for recipients of the comprehensive perinatal services.

(k) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision do not revise or expand the scope of practice of licensed midwives, as defined in Article 24 (commencing with Section 2505) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of
 the Business and Professions Code.

(l) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), on the effective date of the regulations adopted by the Medical Board of California pursuant to Section 2507 of the Business and Professions Code, a licensed midwife shall be eligible to serve as a comprehensive perinatal provider.

(m) For purposes of this section, “family physician” means a primary care physician and surgeon who renders continued comprehensive and preventative health care services to individuals and families, and who has received specialized training in an approved family medicine residency for three years after graduation from an accredited medical school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 632, Sec. 17.   (AB 1622)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14134.55.

The department shall streamline and simplify existing Medi-Cal program procedures in order to improve access to lactation supports and breast pumps among Medi-Cal recipients.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 460, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14134.6.

Long-term health care facilities may charge a resident only the actual price paid by the facility for goods and services actually supplied to the resident and may not charge for hospital gowns. Facilities in the original contract shall inform residents of charges for personal laundry and drycleaning, haircuts, beautician services, manicures, pedicures, phone calls, television rental, and any other services payable by the resident. The facility shall also inform residents of any changes in those charges, and shall indicate on a resident’s bill every good, product, service, and medication for which the resident is being charged, including, if the patient is
 a senior citizen, whether or not a senior discount was obtained on the medication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1628, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14135.

To assure maximum federal financial participation under this chapter, the director shall establish an enrollment fee, premium or similar charge to the extent required by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

14136.

(a) No city or county shall establish equipment and personnel standards for the furnishing of nonemergency medical transportation services for eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries which are in conflict with equipment and personnel standards for reimbursement established by the department pursuant to this chapter. No standard adopted by cities or counties shall require the use of ambulances to supply nonemergency medical transportation, where that standard would conflict with Section 14136.1.

(b) No city or county shall establish any permit, license, or inspection fees in
 excess of the actual cost of providing services directly associated with the provision of a permit, license, or inspection of nonemergency medical transportation vehicles.

(c) Prior to collection of any permit, license, or inspection fees, the city or county shall provide the nonemergency medical transportation provider from whom the fees will be collected with an itemized cost analysis specifying how the fees will be used.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to otherwise limit the authority of a city or county to license, inspect, or regulate nonemergency medical transportation services so long as the regulation is not in conflict with standards established by the department.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a city or county from allowing both emergency and nonemergency medical
 transportation services to operate within its jurisdiction under a sole franchise when such a franchise has been determined necessary to assure the economic viability of those services.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the authority of local government to issue or deny licenses or permits to operate medical transportation services within its jurisdiction on the basis of need and necessity findings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 695, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14136.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, in order for payment to be made to a medical transportation service provider, a patient who requires continuous intravenous medication, medical monitoring, or observation during transport and patients being transferred from an acute care facility to another acute care facility shall be transported by ambulance.

In other situations where nonemergency medical transportation is given, ambulances need not be used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1075, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14136.3.

No prior authorization shall be necessary for the provision of nonemergency medical transportation services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries when the beneficiary is being transported from an acute care hospital following a stay as an inpatient to a nursing facility or any category of intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1329, Sec. 31.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14136.4.

A written treatment authorization request for nonemergency medical transportation services for which a department employed medical consultant had provided conditional prior authorization to the provider of services via telephone, shall not be denied by the Medi-Cal field office when the written treatment authorization request subsequently submitted by the provider substantiates the medical information given with the earlier verbal request, so long as the beneficiary was eligible to receive such services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1372, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14136.5.

No entity which has received funds under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 1601 of the federal Urban Mass Transportation Act shall receive reimbursement for medical transportation services rendered to beneficiaries of the Medi-Cal program in any amount greater or higher than the fee charged by the provider to persons for whom services are not reimbursed by Medi-Cal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 645, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14136.8.

No reimbursement shall be made for medical transportation services provided pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 14132 when the services are prescribed or ordered by a person who has a significant beneficial interest in the medical transportation services rendered unless the nature and extent of that interest have been disclosed in accordance with, and subject to, Section 51466 of Title 22 of the California Administrative Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 746, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14137.

The State Department of Health Services, following review and approval from the State Health and Welfare Agency, shall seek all necessary waivers from the United States Department of Health and Human Services in order to provide in-home and community-based care, as provided for under Section 2176 of the federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981. The waiver proposal shall specifically include plans for the provision of services to any person who would be eligible for community-based and in-home services, as defined by the Department of Health Services, and who would be eligible for the Medi-Cal program, provided for pursuant to this chapter, except
 for the person’s income and who can, therefore, become eligible by meeting spend-down requirements.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14149 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 271.)
-------------------------------------------

14137.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and subject to federal financial participation, covered services under this chapter shall include, subject to utilization controls, medically necessary inpatient and outpatient services associated with the administration of any drug that has been classified by the department or the Food and Drug Administration as having treatment Investigational New Drug (IND) status, when the drug is being administered for the treatment of acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS), AIDS-related complex (ARC), or human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), to otherwise eligible persons.

(b) The department shall adopt emergency regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to implement this section. The adoption of the regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety. Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted by the department in order to implement this section shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. These regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(c) No part of this section shall be construed to require the department to pay for the cost of treatment IND drugs provided for research purposes by
 pharmaceutical companies or any other sponsors at no cost.

(d) Payment for care to any Medi-Cal eligible HIV infected person in need of treatment shall not be denied solely on the basis of the use of a drug having treatment IND status.

(e) When medically feasible, every effort shall be made to administer drugs having treatment IND status on an outpatient basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1197, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14137.8.

Approval of a request for acute inpatient care shall be solely dependent upon the medical necessity for this care, as documented in the proposed treatment plan. Treatment with Investigational New Drugs, clinical trials, or other ancillary or investigational services, if medical necessity is otherwise documented, shall not in itself be construed to be part of a research study protocol, and shall not constitute grounds for denial on that basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 442, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14138.

(a) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department shall purchase vaccines and biological products in bulk from the Centers for Disease Control or any other sources at the lowest cost possible, for use by providers of services under this chapter and the Child Health and Disability Prevention program under Article 6 (commencing with Section 124025) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, in the immunization of eligible children.

(b) It is
 the intent of the Legislature that, to the maximum extent possible, any savings of General Fund moneys realized from the program established pursuant to this section shall be reinvested in programs that are most likely to increase access to, and the quality of, immunization services for children.

(c) In order to achieve maximum cost savings, the Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts under this section is necessary. Therefore, contracts under this section may be on a nonbid basis and shall be exempt from the provisions of the Public Contract Code.

(d) No part of this section shall be construed to require the department to undertake distribution of vaccines and biological products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 478.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.1.  Federally Qualified Health Center Alternative Payment Model Project [14138.1. - 14138.23.]

14138.1.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Alternative encounter” means an encounter provided by the participating FQHC that is approved by the department for the APM project, but that is not recognized as a billable visit as described in subdivision (g) of Section 14132.100. The department, in consultation with participating FQHCs, shall develop a list of approved alternative encounters for the APM project, which may be updated from time to time.

(b) “Alternative payment methodology” (APM) has the same meaning as specified in Section 1396a(bb)(6) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(c) “APM aid category” means a Medi-Cal category
 of aid designated by the department. For all its APM enrollees in an APM aid category, a participating FQHC site shall receive compensation as described under the APM project. The APM aid categories may include, but are not limited to, all of the following categories of aid:

(1) Adults.

(2) Children.

(3) Seniors and persons with disabilities.

(4) The adult expansion population eligible pursuant to Section 14005.60.

(d) “APM enrollee” means a member who is assigned by a principal health plan or subcontracting payer to a participating FQHC for primary care services and who is within one of the designated APM aid categories.

(e) “APM project” means the project authorized by this article.

(f) “APM scope of services” means the scope of services for a participating FQHC for which it is entitled to receive a per-visit rate pursuant to Section 14132.100, but only to the extent those services are covered pursuant to the contract between the department and the applicable principal health plan.

(g) “APM supplemental capitation” means an APM aid category-specific PMPM amount that is paid by the department to a principal health plan having one or more participating FQHCs in its provider network.

(h) “Clinic-specific PMPM” means the monthly, per assigned member, capitated amount the principal health plan or subcontracting payer is required to pay to the participating FQHC for the APM scope of services. The clinic-specific PMPM is
 exclusive of any incentive payments and shall be developed to reflect the amount the participating FQHC would have received under the prospective payment system methodology set forth in Section 14132.100.

(i) “FQHC” means any community or public “federally qualified health center,” as defined in Section 1396d(l)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code and providing services as defined in Section 1396d(a)(2)(C) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(j) “Member” means a Medi-Cal beneficiary who is enrolled with a principal health plan, including those beneficiaries delegated to a subcontracting payer.

(k) “Participating FQHC” means an FQHC participating in the APM project at one or more of the FQHC’s sites. “Participating FQHC” also refers to an FQHC’s site that is participating in the APM project.

 (l) “PMPM” and “per member per month” both mean a monthly payment made for providing or arranging health care services for a member and may refer to a payment by the department to a principal health plan, or by a principal health plan to a subcontracting payer, or by a principal health plan or subcontracting payer to an FQHC, or from and to other entities as specified in this article.

(m) “Principal health plan” means a Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, within a county in which the APM project is implemented.

(n) “Subcontracting payer” means an organization or entity that subcontracts directly or indirectly with a principal health plan to provide or arrange for the care of its members and contains one or more participating FQHCs in its provider network.

(o) “Traditional encounter” means an encounter that is recognized as a billable visit, as described in subdivision (g) of Section 14132.100 or the approved Medi-Cal State Plan.

(p) “Traditional wrap-around payment” means the supplemental payments payable to an FQHC in the absence of the APM project with respect to services provided to Medi-Cal managed care enrollees, which are made by the department pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14087.325 and subdivision (h) of Section 14132.100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 105.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14138.10.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Health care today is more than a face-to-face visit with a provider, but rather a whole-person approach, often including a physician, a care team of other health care providers, technology inside and outside of a health center, and wellness activities, including nutrition and exercise classes, all of which are designed to be more easily incorporated into a patient’s daily life.

(b) Accessible health care in a manner that fits a patient’s needs is important for improving patient satisfaction, building trust, and ultimately improving health outcomes.

(c) FQHCs are essential
 community providers, providing high-quality, cost-effective comprehensive primary care services to underserved communities.

(d) Today, FQHCs face certain restrictions because the current payment structure reimburses an FQHC only when there is a traditional encounter with a provider. Current law prohibits payment for both a primary care visit and mental health visit on the same day.

(e) A more practical approach financially incentivizes FQHCs to provide the right care at the right time. Restructuring the current visit-based, fee-for-service model with a capitated equivalent affords FQHCs the assurance of payment and the flexibility to deliver care in the most appropriate patient-centered manner.

(f) A reformed payment methodology will enable FQHCs to take advantage of alternative encounters. Alternative encounters,
 such as group visits and email consultations, are effective care delivery methods and contribute to a patient’s overall health and well-being.

(g) An alternative payment methodology for FQHCs, designed and implemented as permitted by federal law, should do all of the following:

(1) Provide patient-centered care delivery options to California’s expansive Medi-Cal population.

(2) Promote cost efficiencies, and improve population health and patient satisfaction.

(3) Improve the capacity of FQHCs to deliver high-quality care to a population growing in numbers and in complexity of needs.

(4) Transition away from a payment system that rewards volume with a flexible alternative that recognizes
 the value added when Medi-Cal beneficiaries are able to more easily access the care they need and when providers are able to deliver care in the most appropriate manner to patients.

(5) Promote timely, accurate, complete, and systemic reporting of alternative encounters at FQHCs.

(6) Implement the APM where the FQHC receives at least the same amount of funding it would receive under the current payment system, and in a manner that does not disrupt patient care or threaten FQHC viability.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 107.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14138.12.

(a) (1) The department shall authorize a payment reform project for FQHCs using an APM in accordance with this article.

(2) Implementation of the APM project shall begin no sooner than January 1, 2024, subject to any necessary federal approvals.

(3) Before implementation of an APM project for a participating FQHC site, the department shall notify the FQHC site in writing of the applicable draft clinic-specific PMPM rate(s) for the participating FQHC site. A participating FQHC, with respect to one or more sites of its choosing, may opt to withdraw its participation in the project subject to a notice requirement as determined by the department, but not less than 120 days before
 implementation of an APM project.

(4) At least 90 days prior to implementation of an APM project for a participating FQHC site, the department shall notify a principal health plan in writing of the principal health plan’s specific APM supplemental capitation rates for the participating FQHC. The notification from the department to the principal health plan shall be based on the rates submitted by the department for federal approval. If the APM supplemental capitation rates are modified after the notification to a principal health plan, the department shall notify a principal health plan of the revised rates.

(5) At least 90 days prior to implementation of an APM project for a participating FQHC site, the department shall notify a principal health plan and the FQHC site in writing of the clinic-specific PMPM rate for the participating FQHC site.

(b) The APM project shall comply with federal APM requirements and the department shall file a state plan amendment and seek any federal approvals as necessary for the implementation of this article. Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the department to seek federal approval to affirmatively waive Section 1396a(bb)(6) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or eliminate services provided by FQHCs as covered benefits in the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 109.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14138.13.

(a) The department shall notify every FQHC in the state of the APM project and shall invite any interested FQHC to apply for participation in the APM with respect to one or more of the FQHC’s sites. Consistent with federal law, the state plan amendment described in subdivision (b) of Section 14138.12 shall specify that the department and each participating FQHC voluntarily agrees to the APM.

(b) (1) The department shall develop, in consultation with interested FQHCs and principal health plans and consistent with federal law, the eligibility criteria to be used in evaluating applications from interested FQHCs for participation in the project, which shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(A) The FQHC has the demonstrated ability to collect and submit encounter data in a form and manner that satisfies department requirements.

(B) The FQHC is in good standing with the relevant state and federal regulators.

(C) The FQHC has the financial and administrative capacity to undertake payment reform.

(2) In addition to the criteria listed in paragraph (1), the department may take into consideration the number of APM enrollees assigned by a plan at each FQHC site as an eligibility requirement for FQHC participation.

(3) In accordance with the process and criteria developed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), the department shall approve or deny an interested FQHC site application for
 participation in the project. The department, at its sole discretion, may limit the number of participating FQHCs in the project and the number of counties in which the project will operate.

(4) All principal health plans and applicable subcontracting payers are required to participate in the APM project pursuant to this article to the extent that one or more contracted FQHC sites located in the plan’s county are selected to participate in the project.

(c) The APM shall be applied only with respect to a participating FQHC for services the FQHC provides to its APM enrollees that are within its APM scope of services.

(d) Payment to the participating FQHC shall continue to be governed by the provisions of Sections 14087.325 and 14132.100 for services provided with respect to a person who is a Medi-Cal beneficiary, but
 who is not a Medi-Cal beneficiary within a designated APM aid category.

(e) Payment to the participating FQHC for furnishing services within the scope of the APM to a Medi-Cal beneficiary within a designated APM aid category who is enrolled with a Medi-Cal managed care plan that is not contracted with the FQHC shall be at the per-visit rate determined pursuant to Section 14132.100.

(f) After implementation of an APM project, a participating FQHC, with respect to one or more sites of its choosing, may opt to discontinue its participation in the project subject to a notice requirement of no less than 180 days before the beginning of the next managed care rating period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 110.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14138.14.

(a) A participating FQHC shall be compensated for the APM scope of services provided to its APM enrollees pursuant to this section.

(b) A participating FQHC shall receive from the principal health plan or applicable subcontracting payer reimbursement for each APM enrollee in the form of a clinic-specific PMPM. The department shall determine the clinic-specific PMPM taking into account all the following factors:

(1) Historical utilization of applicable FQHC services in each APM aid category.

(2) The participating FQHC’s prospective payment system rate and applicable adjustments relevant for the fiscal year, such as annual rate
 adjustments.

(3) The projected mix of assigned members across the APM aid categories.

(4) Other trend and utilization adjustments as appropriate in order to reflect the level of reimbursement that would have been received by the participating FQHCs in the absence of the APM project.

(c) A participating FQHC and applicable principal health plan or subcontracting payer may enter into arrangements in which the clinic-specific PMPM amount required in subdivision (b) is paid in more than one capitated increment, as long as the total per-member capitation each month received by the participating FQHC is at least equal to the clinic-specific PMPM.

(d) In cases where a subcontracting payer is involved, the principal health plan shall demonstrate and certify to
 the department that it has contracts or other arrangements in place that provide for meeting the requirements in subdivision (b) and to the extent that the subcontracting payer fails to comply with the applicable requirements in this article, the principal health plan shall then be responsible to ensure the participating FQHC receives all payments due under this article in a timely manner.

(e) The department shall adjust the amounts in subdivision (b) as necessary to account for any change to the prospective payment system rate for participating FQHCs, including changes resulting from a change in the Medicare Economic Index pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14132.100, any changes in the FQHC’s scope of services pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14132.100, and changes in the projected mix of assigned members across APM aid categories.

(f) An FQHC site participating in the
 APM project shall not receive traditional wrap-around payments for visits within the APM scope of services it provides to its APM enrollees for any service period in which it participates in the APM project. A participating FQHC site shall not be entitled to make a reconciliation request pursuant to Section 14132.100 or 14087.325 in connection with visits within the APM scope of services provided to APM enrollees for any service period in which it participates in the APM project.

(g) A principal health plan or subcontracting payer shall not terminate a contract with a participating FQHC for the specific purpose of circumventing the payment obligations implemented pursuant to this section.

(h) FQHCs shall have the right to pursue any available remedy against Medi-Cal managed care plans or subcontracting payers, including judicial review, as appropriate in connection with the
 requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 111.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14138.15.

(a) A principal health plan shall be compensated by the department for the APM scope of services provided to its APM enrollees pursuant to this section.

(b) For each principal health plan that contains at least one participating FQHC in its provider network, the department shall determine an APM supplemental capitation amount for each APM aid category to be paid by the department to the principal health plan, which shall be expressed as a PMPM amount. This supplemental capitation amount will be in addition to the funding for the APM scope of services already contained in the principal health plan’s capitated rates paid by the department and shall be actuarially sound in accordance with Section 438.4 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The department
 shall determine the APM supplemental capitation amount for each APM aid category, taking into account all of the following factors:

(1) The clinic-specific PMPM amounts for each participating FQHC in the plan’s network.

(2) The funding for the APM scope of services already contained in the principal health plan’s capitated rates.

(3) The historical wrap-around payments paid by the department for participating FQHCs for assigned members in each APM aid category.

(4) As applicable, the likely distribution of members among multiple participating FQHCs.

(c) The principal health plan shall report to the department, in a form to be determined by the department in consultation with the principal
 health plan, the number of APM enrollees for each APM aid category in the plan each month.

(d) The department shall pay each principal health plan its applicable APM supplemental capitation amount for the number of APM enrollees for each APM aid category reported by the principal health plan pursuant to subdivision (c), and shall appropriately fund each principal health plan to pay the per-visit rate for unassigned Medi-Cal beneficiaries described in subdivision (e) of Section 14138.13.

(e) The department, in consultation with the principal health plans, shall develop methods to verify the information reported pursuant to subdivision (c), and may adjust the payments made pursuant to subdivision (d) as appropriate to reflect the verified number of APM enrollees for each APM aid category.

(f) The department shall
 adjust the amounts in subdivision (b) as necessary to account for any change to the prospective payment system rate for participating FQHCs, including changes resulting from a change in the Medicare Economic Index pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14132.100, any changes in the FQHC’s scope of services pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14132.100, and changes in the projected mix of assigned members across applicable APM aid categories.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 112.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14138.16.

(a) For the duration of the APM project, the department shall establish a risk corridor structure for the principal health plans relating only to the APM supplemental capitation payments pursuant to Section 14138.15, to the extent consistent with principles of actuarial soundness and in accordance with Section 438.6(b)(1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The risk sharing of the costs under this section shall be constructed by the department with input from affected stakeholders so that it is symmetrical with respect to risk and profit. The department shall develop and specify the terms of the risk corridor in a form and manner specified by the department through all-plan letters or other technical guidance that shall be deemed incorporated into
 the contracts between each affected principal health plan and the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 113.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14138.17.

(a) In order to ensure participating FQHCs have an incentive to manage visits and costs, while at the same time exercising a reasonable amount of flexibility to deliver care in the most efficient and quality driven manner, for the duration of the APM project the department shall, in accordance with this subdivision, establish a payment adjustment structure. The payment adjustment structure shall be developed with stakeholder input and shall meet the requirements of Section 1396a(bb)(6) of Title 42 of the United States Code and Part 438 (commencing with Section 438.1) of Subchapter C of Chapter IV of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The payment adjustment structure shall be applicable on a site-specific basis.

(c) The payment adjustment structure shall permit an aggregate adjustment to the payments received when actual utilization of services for a participating FQHC’s site exceeds or falls below expectations that were reflected within the calculation of the rates developed pursuant to Sections 14138.14 and 14138.15. For purposes of this payment adjustment structure, both actual and expected utilization shall be expressed as the total number of traditional encounters that would be recognized pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 14132.100 for the APM enrollees of the participating FQHC’s site across all APM aid categories and averaged on a per member per year basis.

(d) An adjustment pursuant to this section shall occur no more than once per year per participating FQHC’s site during the APM project, and shall be requested within 90 days of the close of the rating period, except when
 additional time is permitted by the department. All adjustments shall be subject to approval by the department.

(1) An adjustment to payments in the case of higher than expected utilization shall be triggered when utilization exceeds projections in any year. If an adjustment is required in a given year, the participating FQHC site shall receive an aggregate payment adjustment from the principal health plan or applicable subcontracting payer that is based upon the difference between its actual utilization for the year and the projected utilization for the year. The payment adjustment in each instance shall be calculated as follows:

(A) The actual total utilization, expressed as traditional encounters, for the actual APM enrollees for the applicable year shall be determined.

(B) The projected total utilization
 contained in the clinic-specific PMPMs for the actual APM enrollees for the applicable year shall be determined.

(C) The amount in subparagraph (B) shall be subtracted from the amount in subparagraph (A).

(D) The amount in subparagraph(C) shall be multiplied by the per-visit rate that was determined pursuant to Section 14132.100 for the participating FQHC site yielding the payment adjustment for the participating FQHC site. The payment adjustment shall be paid to the participating FQHC site by the principal health plan, or subcontracting payer, as applicable, in one aggregate payment.

(2) To incentivize care delivery in ways that may vary from traditional delivery of care, participating FQHCs shall have the flexibility to experience a lower than expected visit utilization of up to 30 percent of projected
 utilization. The department shall develop, with input from affected stakeholders, objective criteria to ensure minimum standards for access and quality. If an FQHC site does not meet those established quality and access standards, the participating FQHC shall be required to return a portion of PMPM revenue based on a formula developed by the department with input from affected stakeholders. A participating FQHC shall not receive revenue lower than the amount calculated as follows:

(A) The actual total utilization, expressed as traditional encounters, for the applicable year shall be determined.
